Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
572D]

UNIFORM
PREMARITAL AGREEMENT ACT

Section

572D-1 Definitions

572D-2 Formalities

572D-3 Content

572D-4 Effect of marriage

572D-5 Amendment; revocation

572D-6 Enforcement

572D-7 Enforcement; void marriage

572D-8 Limitation of actions

572D-9 Application and construction

572D-10 Prior agreements

572D-11 Short title

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next